Massachusetts, session 194th, S1864.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, any former employee of the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency established
pursuant to chapter 23G who has established membership in a retirement system as provided by
chapter 32 of the General Laws may, while a member in service thereof, be credited with service
for such previous employment of not more than 5 years by paying into the annuity savings fund
of the system in 1 sum or installments, upon such terms as the appropriate retirement board may
prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as retirement deductions
from the employee’s regular compensation for such previous employment, or most recent portion
thereof, as the employee shall elect, together with buyback interest thereon, had such service
of 2

been rendered in the governmental unit by which they were employed at the time of vesting
pursuant to chapter 32 and in a position subject to the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Section 1 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect 2 years after enactment.
of 2